Missouri, session 2026, SB1426.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 304, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 304.162, to read as
follows:
304.162. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Commercial vehicle", any self-propelled or towed
vehicle that has a gross vehicle weight rating of more than
ten thousand pounds;
(2) "Department", the department of transportation;
(3) "Gross vehicle weight rating", the same meaning
given to the term in section 302.700;
(4) "Nonconsensual tow", the movement or
transportation of a commercial vehicle by a tow truck if
such movement or transportation is performed without the
prior consent or authorization of the owner or operator of
the commercial vehicle. Such term also includes any tow of
a commercial vehicle ordered by a law enforcement agency
without the prior consent or authorization of the owner or
operator of the commercial vehicle;

SB 1426 2
(5) "Tow truck", the same meaning given to the term in
section 304.153;
(6) "Towing company", the same meaning given to the
term in section 304.153.
2. The department of transportation shall establish
procedures to address nonconsensual towing, recovery, and
cleanup practices related to the removal of commercial
vehicles from roadways; procedures to receive, investigate,
and adjudicate complaints from an owner, operator, or
insurer of a commercial vehicle involved in a nonconsensual
tow; and procedures for prohibiting towing companies from
performing nonconsensual tows if they are found to be in
violation of this section. The procedures developed under
this section shall be contained in the department of
transportation's towing services standards manual. All
nonconsensual towing, recovery, and cleanup practices shall
comply with this section, the department of transportation's
towing services standards manual, and all other applicable
laws and regulations.
3. The procedures established by the department under
this section shall include, at a minimum:
(1) A process for an owner, operator, or insurer of a
commercial vehicle to file a complaint against a towing
company. All complaints filed under this section shall
contain the name of the complainant; the complainant's
address; the complainant's phone number; the complainant's
email address, if available; the name of the towing company;
the causes of the complaint; and any other facts and
documentation determined by rule to be of assistance to the
department in investigating the complaint;
(2) A process for the department to review a complaint
and any supporting facts and documentation and to render an

SB 1426 3
initial finding. The department shall ensure its process
includes an opportunity for the complainant or towing
company to appeal an initial decision before the department
makes a final determination on the matter;
(3) Factors the department shall consider in
determining whether a charge levied by a towing company was
fair and reasonable. Such factors may include, without
limitation, whether the towing vehicles, all other
equipment, and number of employees and contractors were
required to complete the tow; whether the charges are fair,
reasonable, and customary; whether the total amount of time
required for the service was necessary; the location of the
vehicle being recovered; materials or cargo involved; and
any other information regarding the recovery, towing, or
storage of a commercial vehicle;
(4) Requirements for information that shall be
included on every nonconsensual towing and recovery invoice,
such as the name, address, and telephone number of the
towing company; the date and time that the request for
service was received; contact information for the party that
requested the service; and the time of dispatch, time of
arrival at the scene, and time at which the scene was
cleared. Every invoice for a nonconsensual tow shall
include the words:
"Nonconsensual tows are regulated by the
Missouri Department of Transportation. If you
feel that you have been treated unfairly or
provided a service that was unnecessary, you may
file a complaint with the Missouri Department of
Transportation."; and
(5) A disciplinary matrix for any towing company found
to be in violation of this section or the department of

SB 1426 4
transportation's towing services standards manual. The
matrix shall:
(a) Be weighted based on the severity and number of
violations;
(b) Include provisions for temporarily or permanently
prohibiting a towing company from performing nonconsensual
tows; and
(c) Include a process for the department to
communicate to the Missouri state highway patrol and other
state and local law enforcement and emergency services
agencies any suspension or revocation of a towing company's
authority to perform nonconsensual tows.
4. To assist the department in implementing this
section, the department may establish a "Towing and Recovery
Review Board".
(1) The board shall consist of seven members to be
appointed by the director of the department of
transportation, including:
(a) One member who is an employee of the department;
100 (b) One member who is an employee of the Missouri
101 state highway patrol;
102 (c) One member representing local law enforcement
103 agencies in this state;
104 (d) One member representing motor carriers in this
105 state;
106 (e) One member representing towing companies in this
107 state;
108 (f) One member representing independent owner-operator
109 truck drivers in this state; and
110 (g) One member representing insurance companies in
111 this state.

SB 1426 5
112 (2) Members of the board shall serve without
113 compensation, shall serve three-year terms, and shall serve
114 for no more than two consecutive terms.
115 (3) The board's primary functions shall include
116 assisting the department in reviewing each complaint,
117 identifying potential violations of the towing services
118 standards manual, making recommendations for the initial
119 determination, and approving or rejecting a final
120 determination of the department.
121 5. If an owner or operator of a commercial vehicle
122 requests the use of a specific towing company, law
123 enforcement agencies shall honor that request, unless:
124 (1) The requested towing company cannot arrive at the
125 location of the vehicle within a reasonable time;
126 (2) A traffic safety problem exists and the requested
127 towing company cannot arrive at the location of the vehicle
128 within thirty minutes; or
129 (3) The commercial vehicle is disabled in the roadway
130 and the requested towing company cannot arrive at the
131 location of the vehicle within thirty minutes.
132 6. If the department of transportation or the towing
133 and recovery review board determines there is a genuine
134 dispute as to the reasonableness or amount of the fees
135 assessed by a towing company for a nonconsensual tow, the
136 towing company shall release the commercial vehicle and
137 cargo to the owner, operator, or insurer of the commercial
138 vehicle and cargo without the vehicle owner paying any
139 portion of the fees assessed.
140 7. No towing company shall use a per pound method of
141 charging for a nonconsensual tow.

SB 1426 6
142 8. Storage charges for a nonconsensual tow shall cease
143 accruing upon the date a complaint is filed with the
144 department of transportation.
145 9. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
146 contrary, a nonconsensual tow or associated storage charges
147 shall not create a lien on a commercial vehicle or its
148 cargo.
149 10. A towing company shall provide reasonable access
150 to an owner, operator, or insurer of a commercial vehicle
151 that is the subject of a nonconsensual tow for the following
152 purposes:
153 (1) Collection of personal property from within the
154 vehicle;
155 (2) Investigation or reconstruction of an accident
156 scene; or
157 (3) Retrieval of data from the commercial vehicle's
158 computer system.
159 11. No towing company shall perform a nonconsensual
160 tow when it is prohibited by the department of
161 transportation from performing nonconsensual tows. A towing
162 company that violates this subsection shall be subject to a
163 civil penalty of twenty-five thousand dollars per violation.
164 12. This section shall apply only to nonconsensual
165 tows. This section shall not apply if an owner, operator,
166 or insurer of a commercial vehicle requests the use of a
167 specific towing company and the request is honored.
168 13. The department of transportation shall promulgate
169 rules as necessary for the implementation of this section.
170 Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
171 section 536.010, that is created under the authority
172 delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
173 complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of

SB 1426 7
174 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
175 section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
176 powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
177 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
178 and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
179 then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
180 or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
181 14. Actual costs to implement this section shall be
182 appropriated to the department from the general revenue fund.
✓